Vermont, session 2025-2026, H430.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 33 V.S.A. § 1811 is amended to read:
§ 1811. HEALTH BENEFIT PLANS FOR INDIVIDUALS AND SMALL
EMPLOYERS
* * *
(f)(1) A registered carrier shall use a community rating method acceptable
to the Commissioner of Financial Regulation for determining premiums for
health benefit plans. Except as provided in subdivision (2) of this subsection,
the following risk classification factors are prohibited from use in rating
VT LEG #380505 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.430
2025 Page 2 of 4
individuals, small employers, or employees of small employers, or the
dependents of such individuals or employees:
(A) demographic rating, including age and gender rating;
(B) geographic area rating;
(C) industry rating;
(D) medical underwriting and screening;
(E) experience rating;
(F) tier rating; or
(G) durational rating.
(2)(A)(i) A registered carrier may vary the premium rate for a health
benefit plan as follows:
(I) based on age, provided that the maximum rate differential
for age as determined by ratio shall not exceed 3 to 1; and
(II) based on tobacco usage, provided that the maximum rate
differential for tobacco usage as determined by ratio shall not exceed 1.5 to 1.
(ii) The Commissioner of Financial Regulation shall, by rule,
adopt standards and a process for permitting registered carriers to use one or
more risk classifications in their community rating method in addition to those
specified in subdivision (i) of this subdivision (2)(A), provided that the
premium charged shall not deviate above or below the community rate filed by
the carrier by more than 20 percent after the application of age and tobacco
VT LEG #380505 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.430
2025 Page 3 of 4
rating, if applicable, and provided further that the Commissioner of Financial
Regulation’s rules may not permit any medical underwriting and screening and
shall give due consideration to the need for affordability and accessibility of
health insurance.
(B) The Commissioner of Financial Regulation’s rules shall permit a
carrier, including a hospital or medical service corporation and a health
maintenance organization, to establish rewards, premium discounts, split
benefit designs, rebates, or otherwise waive or modify applicable co-payments,
deductibles, or other cost-sharing amounts in return for adherence by a
member or subscriber to programs of health promotion and disease prevention.
The Commissioner of Financial Regulation shall consult with the
Commissioner of Health, the Director of the Blueprint for Health, and the
Commissioner of Vermont Health Access in the development of health
promotion and disease prevention rules that are consistent with the Blueprint
for Health. Such rules shall:
(i) limit any reward, discount, rebate, or waiver or modification of
cost-sharing amounts to not more than a total of 15 percent of the cost of the
premium for the applicable coverage tier, provided that the sum of any rate
deviations under subdivision (A) of this subdivision (2) does not exceed 30
percent after the application of age and tobacco rating, if applicable;
* * *
VT LEG #380505 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.430
2025 Page 4 of 4
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on January 1, 2026.
VT LEG #380505 v.1